Utah statutes.
63B-11-502.   Maximum amount -- Projects authorized.
(1)  The total amount of bonds issued under this part may not exceed
$52,101,800.
(2) (a) (i)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the
Department of Transportation to provide funds to pay all or part of the costs
of accelerating any of the following state highway construction or
reconstruction projects in Salt Lake County:
(A)  I-15: 10600 South to the Utah County line;
(B)  Final Environmental Impact Statement for Western Transportation Corridor:
I-80 to Utah County;
(C)  I-215: Redwood Road to 4700 South;
(D)  State Street Reconstruction: 9000 South to 10600 South; and
(E)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(d), State Street Reconstruction:
7800 South to 8000 South.
(ii)  If the Department of Transportation is unable to begin or complete a
project authorized by this Subsection (2)(a) because of a court order, the
Department of Transportation, with the approval of Salt Lake County, may
expend bond proceeds to construct one or more projects identified in
Subsection (2)(e).
(b)  When the Utah Transit Authority certifies to the Transportation
Commission that the Utah Transit Authority will pay half the costs of
reconstruction of the Utah Transit Authority railroad overpass on 8000 South
State Street, the Department of Transportation may provide funds from bond
proceeds to pay the other half of the costs of reconstruction of the Utah
Transit Authority railroad overpass on 8000 South.
(c)  As used in Subsections (2)(a) and (b), "costs" may include the cost of
acquiring land, interests in land, easements and rights-of-way, improving
sites, and making all improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient to the
facilities, interest estimated to accrue on these bonds during the period to
be covered by construction of the projects plus a period of six months after
the end of the construction period, interest estimated to accrue on any bond
anticipation notes issued under the authority of Chapter 11, Part 6, 2002
Highway General Obligation Bond Anticipation Notes for Salt Lake County, and
all related engineering, architectural, and legal fees.
(d)  Bond proceeds may not be expended on the State Street Reconstruction:
7800 to 8000 South project until the Transportation Commission has received
the certification required by Subsection (2)(b) from the Utah Transit
Authority.
(e)  As the following projects or future projects identified by Salt Lake
County and the Legislature are prepared and ready for construction by the
Department of Transportation, it is the intent of the Legislature that they
will be accelerated and funded from future general obligation bonds issued in
anticipation of receiving debt service funds from Salt Lake County's 1/4 of
1/4% sales tax proceeds earmarked by Section 59-12-502 and from other funding
sources available to the Department of Transportation, including monies
available from the Centennial Highway Fund and the Statewide Transportation
Improvement Plan: 5600 West Reconstruction: 4500 South to 7000 South; Redwood
Road: 12600 South to Bangerter Highway; I-15: Beck Street Overpass; I-215:
4700 South to SR-201; acquisition of rights-of-way for the Western
Transportation Corridor; 11400 South: I-15 to Redwood Road; and State Street
Reconstruction 6400 South to 7800 South and 8000 South to 9000 South.
(3)  If any portion of the proceeds of the tax paid to the state are not
required to pay principal, interest, and issuance costs of the bonds and the
principal, interest, and issuance costs of the bond have been paid off, or if,
after completion of the projects authorized under Subsection (2)(a) and
payment of the costs of issuing and selling the bonds under Section
63B-11-503, any bond proceeds remain unexpended, the Department of
Transportation may use those unexpended proceeds to pay all or part of the
costs of construction projects in Salt Lake County that have been approved and
prioritized by the Transportation Commission.
(4)  The commission, by resolution, or the state treasurer may make any
statement of intent relating to a reimbursement that is necessary or desirable
to comply with federal tax law.
(5)  The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements related to the
projects before the receipt of proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter.
